Alabama, session 2026rs, HB499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 36-23-1, 36-23-3, and 36-23-7, Code
of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§36-23-1
(a) There shall be one constable for each election
precinct in each county, to be elected as provided by law, who
shall hold office for four years from the first Monday after
the second Tuesday in January next after his election and
until his successor is elected and qualified.
(b) Any county, by local legislation, may abolish the
office of constable.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), any county, by
local legislation, may do any of the following:
(1) Revise the number of constables in the county.
(2) Revise the areas within the county to be
represented by constables.
(3) Revise the conditions under which a constable is
considered to have vacated his or her office."
"§36-23-3
When a vacancy in any election precinct is occasioned
by the death or removal from such precinct of occurs in the
office of any constable thereof, the judge of probate must
Page 1

office of any constable thereof, the judge of probate must
HB499 Enrolled
shall notify the Governor."
"§36-23-7
The A constable shall vacate his or her office by
removal from the election precinct for which he or she is
elected, or as otherwise provided by law."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB499 Enrolled







________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 07-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3